Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0841.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 11b. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 28 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 28.214(6)(b) Pub trst F Unauthorized disclosure of information from LEIN â subsequent offense 4 28.293(1) Pub ord E False information when applying for state ID 5 28.293(2) Pub ord D False information when applying for state ID â second offense 7 28.293(3) Pub ord C False information when applying for state ID â third or subsequent offense 15 28.295(1)(a) Pub ord D Counterfeiting or forging state ID card or using counterfeited or forged state ID card to commit felony punishable by imprisonment for 10 years or more 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 28.295(1)(b) Pub ord E Counterfeiting or forging state ID card or using counterfeited or forged state ID card to commit felony punishable by imprisonment for less than 10 years or a misdemeanor punishable by more than 6 months 5 28.295(2) Pub ord E Selling counterfeited or forged state ID card or possessing counterfeited or forged state ID card with intent to deliver to another person or possessing 2 or more counterfeited or forged state ID cards 5 28.295(5) Property H Using stolen state ID card to commit felony Variable 28.295a(1) Pub ord H False representation to obtain or misuse personal information 4 28.295a(2) Pub ord G False representation to obtain or misuse personal information â second offense 7 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 28.295a(3) Pub ord C False representation to obtain or misuse personal information â third or subsequent offense 15 28.308 Pub saf E False certification or statement in application for enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card 5 28.422(14) Pub saf F Forgery on firearm license application 4 28.422a(5) Pub saf F False statement on firearm sales record 4 28.425b(3) Pub saf F False statement on concealed pistol permit application 4 28.425j(3) Pub saf F Unlawful granting or presenting of pistol training certificate 4 28.425o(6)(c) Pub saf F Carrying concealed pistol or electro-muscular disruption device in prohibited place â third or subsequent offense 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 28.429(4) Pub saf E Failure to store a firearm resulting in injury 5 28.429(5) Pub saf D Failure to store a firearm resulting in serious impairment of body function 10 28.429(6) Pub saf C Failure to store a firearm resulting in death 15 28.435(14)(c)28.435(7)(c) Pub saf G Firearm sale without trigger lock, gun case, or storage container â third or subsequent offense 2 28.468(1)(c) Pub saf E Michigan fireworks safety act violation causing serious impairment 5 28.468(1)(d) Pub saf C Michigan fireworks safety act violation causing death 15 28.516(2) Pub saf F False statement on concealed firearm certificate application 4 28.674 Pub saf F False report of a public threat 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 28.729(1)(a) Pub ord F Failure to register as a sex offender, first offense 4 28.729(1)(b) Pub ord D Failure to register as a sex offender, second offense 7 28.729(1)(c) Pub ord D Failure to register as a sex offender, third or subsequent offense 10 28.729(2) Pub ord F Failure to update sex offender registration information 2 28.754(1) Pub ord F False report of a child abduction 4 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 843 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.